Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Sec. 38.04.900.
Regulations.

The commissioner shall adopt under the Administrative Procedure Act (AS 44.62) regulations believed necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

A municipality has standing to petition the commissioner for the adoption of a regulation, or for the amendment or repeal of an existing regulation, or to appeal a decision of the commissioner with respect to classification, management, or disposal of land made under authority of a regulation adopted under (a) of this section with respect to state land outside the corporate boundaries of the municipality to protect any interest which the municipality is authorized to regulate outside its boundaries under AS

29.35.020

.

If the regulations adopted by the commissioner under (a) of this section fail to provide for a process by which decisions of the commissioner may be appealed, an interested person may petition for reconsideration of a decision. The petition shall contain the information required to be submitted by AS

44.62.220

and shall be acted upon by the commissioner in the manner provided in AS

44.62.230

. For purposes of this subsection, a municipality is an interested person with respect to its interests in land defined in (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 5 ch 181 SLA 1978; am § 94 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 56 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 10 ch 22 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For appeals, see 11 AAC 2.

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For applicability of chapter, see 11 AAC 51, art. 1.

For identification, reservation, and modification of public easements, see 11 AAC 51, art. 2.

For land records system, see 11 AAC 53, art. 1.

For survey and platting standards, see 11 AAC 53, art. 2.

For subdivision development standards, see 11 AAC 53, art. 4.

For platting authority in the unorganized borough, see 11 AAC 53, art. 5.

For land planning and classification, see 11 AAC 55.

For personal use cabin permits, see 11 AAC 65.

For administrative provisions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 1.

For sale or lease at auction, see 11 AAC 67, art. 2.

For preference right sales, see 11 AAC 67, art. 3.

For sale or grant by lottery, see 11 AAC 67, art. 4.

For homesites, see 11 AAC 67, art. 5.

For disposal of agricultural interest, see 11 AAC 67, art. 7.

For land discounts, see 11 AAC 67, art. 11.

For definitions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 12.

Sec. 38.04.910.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of natural resources;

“director” means the director of the division of lands of the Department of Natural Resources;

“fair market value” means the price at which a willing seller and a willing buyer will trade;

“long-term lease” means a lease for a term of more than 10 years;

“multiple use” means the management of state land and its various resource values so that it is used in the combination that will best meet the present and future needs of the people of Alaska, making the most judicious use of the land for some or all of these resources or related services over areas large enough to provide sufficient latitude for periodic adjustments in use to conform to changing needs and conditions; it includes

the use of some land for less than all of the resources; and

a combination of balanced and diverse resource uses that takes into account the short-term and long-term needs of present and future generations for renewable and nonrenewable resources, including, but not limited to, recreation, range, timber, minerals, watershed, wildlife and fish, and natural scenic, scientific, and historic values;

“official cadastral survey” means a United States public land survey or a survey executed under survey instructions issued by the division for the purpose of preparing a cadastral survey plat, and approved and accepted by the division for the state’s official records;

“official control survey” means a position marked on the ground by triangulation or traverse stations established in conformity with standards adopted by United States Coastal and Geodetic Survey for first, second and third order work, whose geodetic positions have been rigidly adjusted on the North American datum of 1927 and approved by the division;

“short-term lease” means a lease for a term of 10 years or less;

“state park” means an area of state land designated by law to be managed for public use and enjoyment of recreational, scenic, cultural, historical, wilderness, and similar values, and includes roadside rests and recreational beaches, state monuments and historic sites, state recreation areas and state parks, including marine parks;

“state trail” means an area designated by law to be managed as a public historic or recreational trail including but not limited to

trails designated under AS

41.21.850

—

41.21.860

, wilderness trails and campsites; and

trails and footpaths designated under AS

41.21.864

—

41.21.872

;

“subdivision” has the meaning given in AS

40.15.900

;

“sustained yield” means the achievement and maintenance in perpetuity of a high level annual or regular periodic output of the various renewable resources of the state land consistent with multiple use;

“wild and scenic river” means a free-flowing river or stream designated as provided in 16 U.S.C. 1271 — 1287 (Wild and Scenic Rivers Act, 82 Stat. 906).

History.

(§ 5 ch 181 SLA 1978; am § 95 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 8 ch 75 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 123 SLA 1988; am § 44 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 5 ch 40 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1988 to alphabetize the defined terms. Paragraph (11) was enacted as paragraph (13). Renumbered in 1998, at which time former paragraphs (11) and (12) were renumbered as (12) and (13), respectively.

Cross references. —

For state parks and recreation areas, see AS 41.21; for state monuments and historic sites, see AS

41.35.030

.

Editor’s notes. —

Despite the provisions of AS

38.05.005

and

38.05.010

, the division of lands has been changed administratively to the division of mining, land, and water.